src/punct-ipk-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

LEXICON Punctuation 
+CLB:%,   # ;
+CLB:%.   # ;
+CLB:%:   # ;
+CLB:%;	  # ;
^excl+CLB:%!	    # ;	!^C^
!<‰+CLB:%!>	  # ;
+CLB:%?	  # ;
+PUNCT:%-  # ;
+HYPH:%" # ;
+HYPH:%« # ;
+HYPH:%» # ;
+PAR:%[ # ;
+PAR:%] # ;
+PAR:%( # ;
+PAR:%) # ;
